Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.090

Approval of educational programs.

The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of educational programs and alternative training. The secretary may utilize or contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to assist in the evaluations. The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for revocation of approval of education programs. The standards and procedures set shall apply equally to educational programs and training in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions. The secretary may establish a fee for educational program evaluations.

[ 1991 c 3 s 264; 1987 c 150 s 69.]